California statutes. Insurance Code
 one-sixtieth of the total reserve required, shall be made each quarter for 15 years, and contributions to the contingency reserve required by subparagraphs (C) and (D) of paragraph (2), equal to one-fortieth of the total reserve required, shall be made each quarter for 10 years provided, however, that contributions may be discontinued so long as the total reserve for all categories listed in subparagraphs (A) through (D) of paragraph (2) exceeds the percentages contained in subparagraphs (A) through (D) when applied against unpaid principal.

(e) Contingency reserves required in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) may be established and maintained net of collateral and reinsurance, provided that, in the case of reinsurance, the reinsurance agreement requires that the reinsurer shall, on or after the effective date of the reinsurance, establish and maintain a reserve in an amount equal to the amount by which the financial guaranty insurance
 corporation reduces its contingency reserve. In addition, contingency reserves required in subdivisions (c) and (d) may be maintained net of refundings and refinancings to the extent the refunded or refinanced issue is paid off or secured by obligations that are directly payable or guarantied by the United States government, and net of insured securities in a unit investment trust or mutual fund that have been sold from the trust or fund without insurance.

(f) The contingency reserves may be released thereafter in the same manner in which they were established and withdrawals therefrom, to the extent of any excess, may be made from the earliest contributions to such reserves remaining therein:

(1) With the prior written approval of the commissioner, if the actual incurred losses for the year, in the case of the categories of guaranties subject to subdivision (c) exceeds 35 percent
 of earned premiums, or in the case of the categories of guaranties subject to subdivision (d) exceed 65 percent of earned premiums.

(2) Upon 30 days prior written notice to the commissioner, provided that the contingency reserve has been in existence for 40 quarters, for reserves subject to subdivision (c), and 30 quarters, for reserves subject to subdivision (d), upon demonstration that the amount carried is in excess of required amounts or excessive in relation to the financial guaranty insurance corporation’s outstanding obligations.

(3) A financial guaranty insurance corporation may invest the contingency reserve in tax and loss bonds or similar securities purchased pursuant to Section 832(e) of the Internal Revenue Code (or any successor provision), only to the extent of the tax savings resulting from the deduction for federal income tax purposes of a sum equal to the annual
 contributions to the contingency reserve. The contingency reserve shall otherwise be invested only in classes of securities or types of investments specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 1170) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 1 and Article 4 (commencing with Section 1190) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 412, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12109.

(a) In addition to the contingency reserve, the case basis method or other method as may be prescribed by the commissioner shall be used to determine loss reserves, which shall include a reserve for claims reported and unpaid net of collateral. A deduction from loss reserves shall be allowed for the time value of money by application of a discount rate equal to the average rate of return on the admitted assets of the financial guaranty insurance corporation as of the date of the computation of that reserve. The discount rate shall be adjusted at the end of each calendar year.

In addition a
 reserve component for incurred but not reported claims shall be reasonably estimated if deemed necessary by the financial guaranty insurance corporation, or following an examination or actuarial analysis, by the commissioner.

(b) Except as otherwise permitted by the commissioner, no deduction shall be made for anticipated salvage in computing case basis loss reserves, unless that salvage is held by or under the control of the financial guaranty insurance corporation and would qualify as an admitted asset under Section 1100 and Article 3 (commencing with Section 1170) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 1 and Article 4 (commencing with Section 1190) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 1, or unless that salvage constitutes or is secured by a clean, irrevocable letter of credit which is approved by the commissioner or complies with the definition of a letter of credit provided in subdivision (e) of Section 12100.

(c) If the insured principal and interest on a defaulted issue of obligations exceed 10 percent of the financial guaranty insurance corporation’s capital, surplus, and contingency reserves, its reserve so established shall be supported by a report from an independent source acceptable to the commissioner.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1032, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

12110.

An unearned premium reserve shall be established and maintained net of reinsurance and collateral with respect to all financial guaranty premiums. Where financial guaranty insurance premiums are paid on an installment basis, an unearned premium reserve shall be established and maintained, net of reinsurance, computed on a daily or monthly pro rata basis. All other financial guaranty insurance premiums written shall be earned in proportion with the expiration of exposure, or by such other method as may be prescribed or approved by the
 commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 412, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12111.

An admitted financial guaranty insurance corporation shall adopt procedures reasonably calculated to ensure, to the extent it is commercially feasible for the financial guaranty insurance corporation, that any prospectus which discloses that a policy of financial guaranty insurance has been issued also discloses that in the event the financial guaranty insurance corporation were to become insolvent, any claims arising under the policies of financial guarantee insurance are excluded from coverage by the California Insurance Guaranty Association, established pursuant
 to Article 15.2 (commencing with Section 1063) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 412, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12112.

(a) Except as provided in Section 12118, financial guaranty insurance may be transacted in this state only by an insurer admitted to transact financial guaranty insurance.

(b) The following guaranties are permissible:

(1) Financial guaranty insurance shall be written only to insure timely payment of contractual obligations, including principal and interest, purchase obligations, dividends, or any other payment
 obligation, however characterized of the following:

(A) Municipal obligation bonds.

(B) Special revenue bonds.

(C) Industrial development bonds.

(D) Obligations of corporations, trusts, or similar entities established under applicable law.

(E) Partnership obligations.

(F) Asset-backed securities, trust certificates and trust obligations other than mortgage-backed securities secured by first mortgages on real property which are insurable by a mortgage guaranty insurer authorized under Chapter 2A (commencing with Section 12640.01) of Part 6 of Division 2, unless one of the following applies:

(i) The mortgages with loan-to-value ratios in excess of 80 percent are insured by mortgage guaranty insurers authorized under Chapter 2A (commencing with Section 12640.01) of Part 6 of Division 2, are insured by mortgage guaranty insurers licensed under the laws of any other state if that insurer has a claims paying rating of investment grade from a securities rating agency acceptable to the commissioner, or are in an aggregate principal amount less than the single risk limits prescribed in subdivision (e) of Section 12115.

(ii) Additional mortgages with principal balances, other collateral with a market value, or, provided the insured risk is investment grade, excess spread, in each instance in an amount at least equal to the coverage that would otherwise be provided by those mortgage guaranty insurers in accordance with item (i) of this subparagraph are pledged as additional
 support for the asset-backed securities.

(G) Installment purchase agreements executed as a condition of sale.

(H) Consumer debt obligations.

(I) Utility first mortgage obligations.

(J) Any other debt instrument or monetary obligation that the commissioner determines by order, regulation, or written consent to be substantially similar to any of the foregoing.

(2) A corporation may insure the timely payment of monetary obligations in any category designated in paragraph (1), notwithstanding that the obligation may be insured by a financial guaranty insurance policy issued by another insurer. In the event that any obligation is insured by more than one financial guaranty insurance policy,
 then each of the insurance policies may by its terms specify its priority of payment in the event of a default under the obligation insured or under any other insurance policy, provided that an insurer shall be entitled to take into account payment under another policy insuring the obligation for purposes of establishing and maintaining loss reserves only to the extent that the policy issued by the insurer provides for payment only in the event of payment default under both the obligation and the other policy.

(3) A corporation may also write financial guaranty insurance, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 12100 to insure the timely payment of non-United States dollar debt instruments or other monetary obligations denominated or payable in foreign currency, only for the categories listed in subparagraphs (A) to (J), inclusive, of paragraph (1), provided that each of the following conditions is
 satisfied:

(A) The currency is that of an Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development country or another country whose sovereign rating is investment grade, or the country is not disapproved by the commissioner within 30 days following receipt of written notification. The commissioner shall not disapprove the country if it is demonstrated that there is no undue risk associated with insuring the timely payment of the instruments or obligations. In making such a determination, the commissioner shall take into consideration the corporation’s outstanding liabilities on noninvestment grade instruments and obligations in relation to its outstanding liabilities on all instruments and obligations and in relation to the amount of surplus to policyholders.

(B) Reserves required pursuant to Sections 12108, 12109, and 12110 in regard to the obligations are established and adjusted
 quarterly based upon the then current foreign exchange rates.

(C) The obligations do not exceed 25 percent of an insurer’s aggregate net liability.

(D) The aggregate and single risk limitations prescribed by Section 12106 and 12115 are determined by applying the then current foreign exchange rates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 412, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12113.

An admitted financial guaranty insurance corporation shall keep copies of all relevant materials prepared by the insurer or used in the initial underwriting or ongoing monitoring of insured risk; all relevant documents pertaining to changes in the credit risk or performance of the insured on the obligation, and all materials pertaining to the examination of the condition of collateral, assets, or other security; and any other materials requested by the commissioner. All those materials shall be maintained for the entire period during which the insurance is in force and shall be available for examination upon request of the commissioner by the commissioner or
 by any rating agency approved by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1032, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

12114.

(a) An insurer may insure obligations enumerated in subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 12112 that are not investment grade so long as at least 95 percent of the insurer’s total net liability on the kinds of obligations enumerated in those subparagraphs is investment grade.

(b) The financial guaranty insurance corporation shall at all times maintain capital, surplus, and
 contingency reserve in the aggregate no less than the sum of the following:

(1) 0.3333 percent of the total net liability under guaranties of municipal bonds and utility first mortgage obligations.

(2) 0.6666 percent of the total net liability under guaranties of investment grade asset-backed securities.

(3) 1.0 percent of the total net liability under guaranties, secured by collateral or having a term of seven years or less of:

(A) Investment grade industrial development bonds, and

(B) Other investment grade obligations.

(4) 1.5 percent of the total net liability under guaranties of other investment grade obligations.

(5) 2.0 percent of the total net liability under guaranties of:

(A) Noninvestment grade consumer debt obligations, and

(B) Noninvestment grade asset-backed securities.

(6) 3.0 percent of the total net liability under guaranties of noninvestment grade obligations secured by first mortgages on commercial real estate and having loan-to-value ratios of 80 percent or less.

(7) 5.0 percent of the total net liability under guaranties of other noninvestment grade obligations.

(8) If the amount of collateral required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) is no longer maintained, that proportion of the obligation insured which is not so
 collateralized shall be subject to the aggregate limits specified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b).

(9) Additional surplus determined by the commissioner to be adequate to support the writing of surety insurance and credit insurance if the financial guaranty insurance corporation has been authorized to transact surety insurance and credit insurance as authorized by Section 12102.

(c) Whenever the reserves for outstanding credit insurance losses or loss expenses or any insurer licensed in this state to transact financial guaranty insurance are determined by the commissioner to be inadequate, he or she shall require the insurer to maintain additional reserves.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 412, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12115.

A financial guaranty insurance corporation admitted to transact financial guaranty insurance in this state shall limit its exposure to loss, net of collateral and reinsurance, as follows:

(a) For municipal obligation bonds and special revenue bonds:

(1) The insured average annual debt service with respect to any one entity and backed by a single revenue source may not exceed 10 percent of the aggregate of the financial guaranty insurance
 corporation’s capital, surplus, and contingency reserve.

(2) The insured unpaid principal issued by a single entity and backed by a single revenue source may not exceed 75 percent of the aggregate of the financial guaranty insurance corporation’s capital, surplus, and contingency reserve.

(b) For each issue of asset-backed securities issued by a single entity, and for each pool of consumer debt obligations, the lesser of:

(1) Insured average annual debt service; or

(2) Insured unpaid principal (reduced by the extent to which the unpaid principal of the supporting assets and, provided the insured risk is investment grade, excess spread, exceed the insured unpaid principal) divided by nine; shall not exceed 10 percent of the aggregate of the financial
 guaranty insurance corporation’s capital, surplus, and contingency reserve, provided that no asset in the pool supporting the asset-backed securities exceeds the single risk limits prescribed in subdivision (e) of Section 12115 if directly guarantied; and provided further that, if the issuer of such insured asset-backed securities is a special purpose corporation, trust or other entity and that issuer shall have indebtedness outstanding with respect to any other pool of assets, either such other indebtedness shall be entitled to the benefits of a financial guaranty policy of the same financial guaranty insurance corporation, or such other indebtedness shall (A) be fully subordinated to the insured obligation, with respect to, or be nonrecourse with respect to, the pool of assets that supports the insured obligation, (B) be nonrecourse to the issuer other than with respect to the asset pool securing such other indebtedness and proceeds in excess of the proceeds necessary to pay the insured obligation (“excess
 proceeds”) and (C) not constitute a claim against the issuer to the extent that the asset pool securing such other indebtedness or excess proceeds are insufficient to pay such other indebtedness.

(c) For obligations issued by a single entity and secured by commercial real estate, and not meeting the definition of asset-backed securities, the insured unpaid principal less 50 percent of the appraised value of the underlying real estate shall not exceed 10 percent of the aggregate of the financial guaranty insurance corporation’s capital, surplus, and contingency reserve.

(d) For utility first mortgage obligations, the insured average annual debt service shall not exceed 10 percent of the aggregate of the financial guaranty insurance corporation’s capital, surplus, and contingency reserve.

(e) For all other financial
 guaranties, the insured unpaid principal for any one entity and backed by a single revenue source may not exceed 10 percent of the aggregate of the financial guaranty insurance corporation’s capital, surplus, and contingency reserve.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 412, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12115.5.

(a) If an admitted financial guaranty insurance corporation fails to maintain a rating in any of the top three generic rating classifications by any securities rating agency acceptable to the commissioner, it shall immediately send written notification of this failure to both the commissioner and the insurance regulatory authority in its state of domicile.

(b) (1) If an admitted financial guaranty insurance corporation fails to maintain a rating at least
 equal to the highest notch in the fourth generic rating classification by any securities rating agency acceptable to the commissioner, the insurer shall prepare and file with the commissioner a two-year business plan, in reasonable detail, together with other information that the commissioner requires. The plan shall be filed within 45 days of the date when the insurer fails to maintain that rating.

(2) In response to that failure, the commissioner may conduct any examination or analysis of the insurer’s assets, liabilities, and operations, including its pricing, that he or she deems necessary.

(3) After reviewing the business plan and conducting any examination or analysis, the commissioner may issue a corrective order specifying the corrective measures that he or she determines to be required, and the insurer shall implement those measures. In determining corrective measures,
 the commissioner may take into account the factors that he or she deems relevant with respect to the insurer, including the results of the examination or analysis.

(c) If an admitted financial guaranty insurance corporation fails to maintain an investment grade rating by any securities rating agency acceptable to the commissioner, it shall not do either of the following without the commissioner’s specific prior written approval:

(1) If domiciled in this state, accept additional risks or issue new policies anywhere.

(2) If domiciled in another state, accept additional risks in this state or issue new policies insuring risks in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 412, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12116.

(a) If an admitted financial guaranty insurance corporation at any time exceeds any limitation prescribed by subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 12114 or Section 12115, the corporation shall immediately notify the commissioner in writing. Upon receipt of the written notification, or independent of its receipt, the commissioner may issue an order to show cause why the financial guaranty insurance corporation should not cease transacting financial guaranty insurance business. If the commissioner issues such an order, the commissioner shall serve
 notice of hearing with the order to the financial guaranty insurance corporation stating the time and place therefor, and the conduct, condition or grounds upon which the commissioner has made the order. The hearing shall occur not less than 20 nor more than 30 days after notice is served. At the hearing, the burden to show cause why the financial guaranty insurance corporation should not cease transacting new financial guaranty insurance shall be borne solely by the financial guaranty insurance corporation.

(b) If the commissioner does not issue an order pursuant to subdivision (a) upon receiving written notice, the financial guaranty insurance corporation shall, within 30 days after the limitations are breached, submit a written plan to the commissioner detailing the steps that it will take or has taken to reduce its exposure to loss to no more than the amounts permitted by subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 12114 and Section 12115. If,
 after review of the written plan, the commissioner determines that the corporation has not presented reasonable steps to reduce its exposure to loss to not more than the permitted amounts, the commissioner may issue an order to show cause following the same procedures as prescribed in subdivision (a).

(c) If, after notice and hearing pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), the commissioner determines that the financial guaranty insurance corporation has exceeded any limitation prescribed by subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 12114 or Section 12115, the commissioner may order the corporation to cease transacting any new financial guaranty insurance business until its exposure to loss no longer exceeds these limitations.

(d) The provisions of this section and Section 12115.5 shall in no way limit the stop order power of the commissioner under any other section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 412, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12116.5.

(a) The commissioner may, for good cause, implement by regulation, order, or written consent, reasonable conditions or limitations under which any or all admitted financial guaranty insurance corporations may insure the type of business described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 12100 or subdivision (a) of Section 12119, reduce reserves in respect of collateral described in paragraph (2) or (5) of subdivision (e) of Section 12100, or engage in the transactions described in subdivision (b) of Section 12106, when, in the judgment
 of the commissioner, those conditions or limitations are necessary and appropriate to safeguard insurer solvency.

(b) Whenever the reserves for outstanding liabilities for obligations insured under subdivision (c) of Section 12100 are determined by the commissioner to be inadequate, he or she shall require the insurer to maintain additional reserves.

(c) The commissioner may disallow, for purposes of any financial statements or reports required or permitted to be filed under this code, the recognition of collateral authorized by paragraph (2) or (5) of subdivision (e) of Section 12100 if the commissioner finds after inquiry and review that the collateral fails to legally secure the obligations to which it relates, the collateral is inaccurately valued, the value of the collateral is insufficient in relation to the obligations secured, or the legality or value of the collateral
 cannot readily be ascertained based on information provided.

(d) The commissioner may require restatement or other relevant revision of any admitted financial guaranty insurer’s annual or other financial statement or report required or permitted to be filed under this code if the commissioner finds after inquiry and review that any transaction entered into under subdivision (b) of Section 12106 has the effect of distorting, misrepresenting, or otherwise rendering inaccurate, misleading, or incomplete the financial condition of the insurer in any material respect.

(e) No credit default swap authorized or permitted to be insured, acquired, or otherwise used for any purpose by any admitted financial guaranty insurance corporation under any provision of this code shall be used in any manner for more than one purpose, or under more than one statutory authorization, unless authorized by
 this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 412, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12117.

A financial guaranty insurance corporation shall not be deemed in violation of any limitation prescribed by Section 12115 with respect to any financial guaranty insurance outstanding prior to January 1, 1991, if the financial guaranty insurance corporation was in compliance with the applicable single risk limit in effect in this state at the time that the financial guaranty insurance policy was issued. If the financial guaranty insurance corporation was not so in compliance, it shall comply with the limitations prescribed by Section 12115 no later than January 1, 1994.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1032, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

12118.

An admitted insurer transacting financial guaranty insurance in this state but which is not admitted to transact, financial guaranty insurance in this state shall be subject to all the provisions of this article and:

(a) May continue to write financial guaranties of the type authorized by subdivision (b) of Section 12112 as follows:

(1) For a period not to exceed five years from January 1, 1991, provided that by July 1, 1991, application
 shall be made to the commissioner to organize or admit a financial guaranty insurance corporation, controlled by or under common control with that insurer, which financial guaranty insurance corporation, once admitted, shall immediately assume all of the financial guaranty insurance in force on the books of the insurer which was written on or after January 1, 1991.

(2) In the case of an insurer transacting only financial guaranty insurance prior to January 1, 1991, which would comply with all of the requirements for admission as a financial guaranty insurance corporation under this article and which has made application, and has paid the filing fee of five thousand dollars ($5,000) required by Section 12105 to amend its current certificate of authority to financial guaranty insurance by no later than March 1, 1991, the insurer may continue to write financial guaranty insurance until the time that the commissioner issues or denies the amended
 certificate of authority or the application is otherwise terminated.

(b) Shall, if it does not make application for an amended certificate of authority to transact the business of financial guaranty insurance pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), cease writing any new financial guaranty insurance by no later than July 1, 1991. An insurer subject to this paragraph may do one or more of the following:

(1) Reinsure its net in-force business with an admitted financial guaranty insurance corporation.

(2) Subject to the prior approval of its domiciliary commissioner and the commissioner of this state, reinsure all or part of its net in-force business with an insurer meeting the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 12121, except that, in the case of an admitted surety insurer or a nonadmitted insurer that
 transacts financial guaranty insurance and insurance other than financial guaranty insurance, the insurer’s combined capital and surplus shall be at least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) and subparagraphs (A) to (F), inclusive, of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 12121 shall not be applicable. The assuming insurer shall maintain reserves for the reinsured business in the manner applicable to the ceding insurer under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 12121.

(3) Thereafter continue the risks then in force and, with 30 days prior written notice to its domiciliary commissioner, write new financial guaranty policies provided the writing of the policies is reasonably prudent to mitigate either the amount of or possibility of loss in connection with business written prior to January 1, 1991. However, an insurer shall receive the prior approval of its domiciliary commissioner and the commissioner of this state before
 writing any new financial guaranty insurance policies that would have the effect of increasing its risk of loss.

(c) Shall, for all guaranties in force prior to January 1, 1991, including those that fall under the definition of financial guaranty insurance contained in subdivision (a) of Section 12100, be subject to the contingency reserve, reserves for loss and loss adjustment expenses, and unearned premium reserve requirements applicable for municipal bond insurance policies which were in effect prior to July 1, 1989, or January 1, 1991, as appropriate. To the extent that the insurer’s contingency reserves maintained as of the effective date of this article are less than those required under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 12108, the insurer shall have until January 1, 1994, to bring its reserves into compliance, except that a part of the reserve may be released proportional to the reduction in net total liabilities resulting from
 reinsurance, provided that the reinsurer shall, on the effective date of the reinsurance, establish a reserve in an amount equal to the amount released and, in addition, a part of the reserve may be released with the approval of the commissioner upon demonstration that the amount carried is excessive in relation to the corporation’s outstanding obligations.

(d) Shall be subject to the reserve requirements applicable to financial guaranty insurance corporations, for business transacted on or after January 1, 1991.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 662, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

12119.

Policy forms and any amendments thereto shall be filed with the commissioner within 30 days after their use in this state by the financial guaranty insurance corporation.

(a) (1) Every policy shall provide that, in the event of a payment default or insolvency of the obligor, there shall be no acceleration of the payments required to be made under the policy with respect to guarantied obligations except at the option of the financial guaranty insurance corporation.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the following provisions apply:

(A) A policy may insure amounts payable under a credit default swap or interest rate, currency, or other swap upon a credit event or termination event if the expected amount payable on an accelerated basis in respect of any individual obligation referenced by a credit default swap or in the aggregate under an interest rate, currency, or other swap does not exceed the single risk limits prescribed in subdivision (e) of Section 12115.

(B) A policy insuring a credit default swap referencing an obligation shall be treated as if the insurer had directly insured the referenced obligation for all other purposes of this article, including, without limitation, contingency reserve requirements, except that the currency of amounts owed under the credit default
 swap, rather than the currency of the obligations referenced by the credit default swap, shall apply for purposes of determining whether the obligation is a permissible guaranty under subdivision (b) of Section 12112.

(b) Every policy shall contain a statement that in the event the insurer were to become insolvent, any claims arising under a policy of financial guaranty insurance are excluded from coverage by the California Insurance Guaranty Association, established pursuant to Article 15.2 (commencing with Section 1063) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(c) The commissioner may prescribe additional minimum policy provisions determined by the commissioner to be necessary or appropriate to protect policyholders, claimants, obligees, or indemnitees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 412, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12120.

An admitted financial guaranty insurance corporation with respect to financial guaranty insurance rates, shall not be subject to Sections 1861.01 and 1861.05, except that financial guaranty insurance rates shall not be excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory or otherwise in violation of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 1850) of Part 2 of Division 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1032, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

12121.

(a) For financial guaranty insurance that takes effect on or after January 1, 1991, an insurer authorized to transact financial guaranty insurance shall receive credit for reinsurance as an asset or as a reduction from liabilities only if the reinsurance is placed with a reinsurer as provided in subdivision (b), and if the reinsurance agreement may be terminated or amended only if one or more of the following applies:

(1) At the option of the reinsurer or the ceding insurer if the reinsurance agreement provides that the liability of the reinsurer with respect to policies in effect at the date of termination shall continue until the expiration or
 cancellation of each such policy.

(2) With the consent of the ceding company, if the reinsurance agreement provides for a cutoff of the reinsurance in force as of the date of termination.

(3) At the discretion of the commissioner acting as rehabilitator, liquidator, or receiver of the ceding or assuming insurer.

(b) Reinsurance may be placed with one of the following:

(1) Another financial guaranty insurance corporation admitted pursuant to this article to transact financial guaranty insurance which may be under common control with the ceding financial guaranty insurer or financial guaranty corporation, but which does not own, and is not owned by, in whole or
 in part, directly or indirectly, the ceding financial guaranty insurer or financial guaranty insurance corporation.

(2) Another financial guaranty insurance corporation admitted pursuant to this article which does own, or is owned by, in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, the ceding financial guaranty insurer or financial guaranty insurance corporation provided that (A) the value of the ownership interest in either case does not exceed the greater of (i) 35 percent of its combined capital and surplus or (ii) 50 percent of the excess of its surplus over its liabilities and capital, and (B) the financial guaranty insurance corporation providing the reinsurance is rated at the time of cession and thereafter in one of the two top generic rating classifications by a securities rating agency acceptable to the commissioner.

(3) An insurer admitted to transact surety insurance but not financial guaranty insurance pursuant to this article, if the insurer meets all of the following criteria:

(A) Has and maintains combined capital and surplus of at least fifty million dollars ($50,000,000).

(B) Establishes and maintains the reserves required in Sections 12108, 12109, and 12110, except that if the reinsurance agreement is not pro rata the contribution to the contingency reserve shall be equal to 50 percent of the quarterly earned insurance premium.

(C) Complies with the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 12114, except that its maximum aggregate assumed total net liability shall be
 one-half that permitted for a financial guaranty insurance corporation. For the purpose of determining compliance with this clause, the assuming reinsurer, unless at the time of cession and thereafter it is rated in one of the two top generic rating classifications by a securities rating agency acceptable to the commissioner, shall be limited to using 10 percent of its capital and surplus in making this calculation.

(D) Complies with the provisions of Section 12115.

(E) If the insurer is an affiliate, parent, or subsidiary of the financial guaranty insurance corporation, the affiliate, parent, or subsidiary shall not assume a percentage of the corporation’s total liability in excess of its percentage of equity interest in the corporation.

(F) Assumes from the financial guaranty insurance corporation and any affiliate, parent, or subsidiary that is a financial guaranty insurance corporation or an insurer writing only financial guaranty insurance as is or would be permitted by this article, and any other kinds of insurance that a financial guaranty insurance corporation may write in this state, together with all other reinsurers subject to this paragraph, less than 50 percent of the total exposures insured by the financial guaranty insurance corporation and such affiliates, parent, or subsidiaries after deducting any reinsurance placed with another financial guaranty insurance corporation that is not an affiliate, parent, or subsidiary or an insurer writing only financial guaranty insurance as is or would be permitted by this article that is not an affiliate, parent, or subsidiary.

(4) A nonadmitted insurer transacting only financial guaranty insurance as is or would be permitted by this article and that otherwise complies with the provisions of subparagraphs (A), (E), and (F) of paragraph (3), and otherwise complies with paragraph (1) or (2), and in compliance with the requirements of subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 922.4 or subdivision (a) of Section 922.5, as applicable.

(5) A nonadmitted insurer not transacting only financial guaranty insurance as is or would be permitted by this article and that complies with the provisions of subparagraphs (A), (C), (E), and (F) of paragraph (3) in an amount not exceeding the liabilities carried by the ceding financial guaranty insurance corporation and in compliance with the requirements of subdivision (b), (c), or (d) of Section 922.4 or subdivision (a) or (b) of
 Section 922.5, as applicable.

(c) In determining whether the financial guaranty insurance corporation meets the limitations imposed by Section 12115, in addition to credit for other types of qualifying reinsurance, the financial guaranty insurance corporation’s aggregate risk may be reduced to the extent of the limit for aggregate reinsurance but, in no event, in an amount greater than the amount of the aggregate risk that will become due during the unexpired term of the reinsurance agreement in excess of the financial guaranty insurance
 corporation’s retention pursuant to the reinsurance agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 277, Sec. 13.   (SB 1216)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12122.
